Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Article I General Provisions

34-41-1.01.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Rhode Island Real Estate Time-Share Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-1.02.
Definitions.

In any time-share instrument, unless specifically provided otherwise or the context otherwise requires, and in this chapter:

“Affiliate of a developer” means any person who controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with a developer. A person “controls” a developer if the person (i) is a general partner, officer, director, or employer of the developer, (ii) directly or indirectly or acting in concert with one or more other persons, or through one or more subsidiaries, owns, controls, holds with power to vote, or holds proxies representing, more than twenty percent (20%) of the voting interest in the developer, (iii) controls in any manner the election of a majority of the directors of the developer, or (iv) has contributed more than twenty percent (20%) of the capital of the developer. A person “is controlled by” a developer if the developer (i) is a general partner, officer, director, or employer of the person, (ii) directly or indirectly or acting in concert with one or more other persons, or through one or more subsidiaries, owns, controls, holds with power to vote, or holds proxies representing, more than twenty percent (20%) of the voting interest in the person, (iii) controls in any manner the election of a majority of the directors of the person, or (iv) has contributed more than twenty percent (20%) of the capital of the person. Control does not exist if the powers described in this subdivision are held solely as security for an obligation and are not exercised.

“Association” means the association organized under §

34-41-3.01(a)

.

“Conversion building” means a building that at any time before the disposition of any time share was occupied wholly or partially by persons other than purchasers and persons who occupied with the consent of purchasers.

“Developer” means any person who (i) offers to dispose of or disposes of his or her interest in a time share not previously disposed of, or (ii) succeeds under §

34-41-3.04

to any special developer right, or (iii) applies for registration of the time share under Article V of this chapter.

“Dispose” or “disposition” means a voluntary transfer of any legal or equitable interest in a time share, but does not include the transfer or release of a security interest.

“Manager” means any person, other than all time-share owners or the association, designated in or employed pursuant to the time-share instrument or project instrument to manage the time-share units.

“Managing entity” means the manager or, if there is no manager, the association.

“Offering” means any advertisement, inducement, solicitation, or attempt to encourage any person to acquire a time share, other than as security for an obligation. An advertisement in a newspaper or other periodical of general circulation, or in any broadcast medium to the general public, of a time share in a unit not located in this state, is not an offering if the advertisement states that an offering may be made only in compliance with the law of the jurisdiction in which the unit or units are located; such offering shall contain the following language in bold-faced print “THIS IS NOT AN OFFERING PROTECTED BY THE RHODE ISLAND REAL ESTATE TIME-SHARE ACT;” provided, however, if the subject time-share property is registered pursuant to Article V of this chapter, such language need not be printed on the offering.

“Person” means a natural person, corporation, government, governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, or other legal or commercial entity. (In the case of a land trust, however, “person” means the beneficiary of the trust rather than the trust or the trustee.)

“Project” means real property, subject to a project instrument, containing more than one unit. A project may include units that are not time-share units.

“Project instrument” means one or more recordable documents, by whatever name denominated, applying to the whole of a project and containing restrictions or covenants regulating the use, occupancy, or disposition of units in a project, including any amendments to the document but excluding any law, ordinance, or governmental regulation.

“Purchaser” means any person, other than a developer, who by means of a voluntary transfer acquires a legal or equitable interest in a time share other than as security for an obligation.

“Time share” means a time-share estate or a time-share license.

“Time share estate” means a right to occupy a unit or any of several units during five (5) or more separated time periods over a period of at least five (5) years, including renewal options, coupled with a freehold estate or an estate for years in a time-share property or a specified portion thereof.

“Time-share expenses” means expenditures, fees, charges, or liabilities (i) incurred with respect to the time shares by or on behalf of all time-share owners in one time-share property, and (ii) imposed on the time-share units by the entity governing a project of which the time-share property is a part, together with any allocations to reserves, but excluding purchase money payable for time shares.

“Time-share instrument” means one or more documents, by whatever name denominated, creating or regulating time shares.

“Time-share liability” means the liability for time-share expenses allocated to each time share pursuant to §

34-41-2.02(a)(4)

.

“Time-share license” means a right to occupy a unit or any of several units during five (5) or more separated time periods over a period of at least five (5) years, including renewal options, not coupled with a freehold estate or an estate for years.

“Time-share owner” means a person who is an owner or co-owner of a time share other than as security for an obligation.

“Time-share property” means one or more time-share units subject to the same time-share instrument, together with any other real estate or rights therein appurtenant to those units.

“Time-share unit” means a unit in which time shares exist.

“Unit” means real property, or a portion thereof, designated for separate use.

“Venue and jurisdiction” means that jurisdiction is conferred on the superior court and the general rules of venue are unaffected by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-1.03.
Status and taxation of time-share estates.

Except as expressly modified by this chapter and notwithstanding any contrary rule of common law, a grant of an estate in a unit conferring the right of possession during a potentially infinite number of separated time periods creates an estate in fee simple having the character and incidents of such an estate at common law, and a grant of an estate in a unit conferring the right of possession during five (5) or more separated time periods over a finite number of years equal to five (5) or more, including renewal options, creates an estate for years having the character and incidents of such an estate at common law.

Each time-share estate constitutes for all purposes a separate estate in real property. Assessments shall be made on the real property value of the interval time-share estates, or on the real property value of the development.

Notwithstanding anything herein, and/or notwithstanding any of the provisions of chapter 34-36 (“Condominium Ownership Act”), 34-36.1 (“Rhode Island Condominium Act”), or 34-41 (“Rhode Island Real Estate Time-Share Act”) to the contrary the tax assessor may use any identifiable and commonly accepted method of appraisal as a basis for arriving at value conclusions for the interval time-share estate or the development, including, but not limited to, elements of replacement cost, income analysis, and comparable sales of time-share interval estates, similarly configured hotels, and/or real estate developments, with appropriate deductions for personal property, intangible assets, and excess marketing costs, allowing for application of discounted cash flow methodology where appropriate.

In making an assessment of the real property value of the interval time-share estates or the development, tax assessor notices of assessment and bills for taxes must be furnished to the managing entity, if any, or otherwise to each time-share owner, but the managing entity is not liable for the taxes as a result thereof. In accordance herein, each municipality is hereby authorized and empowered to exercise all rights and powers for the collection of taxes as are conferred by virtue of title 44.

This section shall apply to fee and non-fee time-share real property.

A document transferring or encumbering a time-share estate may not be rejected for recordation because of the nature or duration of that estate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 524, § 1.

34-41-1.04.
Variation by agreement.

Except as expressly provided in this chapter, provisions of this chapter may not be varied by agreement, and rights conferred by this chapter may not be waived. A developer may not act under a power of attorney, or use any other device, to evade the limitations or prohibitions of this chapter or of the time-share instrument.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-1.05.
Unconscionable agreement or term of contract.

The court, upon finding as a matter of law that a contract or contract clause was unconscionable at the time the contract was made, may refuse to enforce the contract, enforce the remainder of the contract without the unconscionable clause, or limit the application of any unconscionable clause in order to avoid an unconscionable result.

Whenever it is claimed, or appears to the court, that a contract or any contract clause is or may be unconscionable, the court, in order to aid the court in making the determination, shall afford the parties a reasonable opportunity to present evidence as to:

The commercial setting of the negotiations;

Whether a party has knowingly taken advantage of the inability of the other party reasonably to protect his or her interests by reason of physical or mental infirmity, illiteracy, or inability to understand the language of the agreement or similar factors;

The effect and purpose of the contract or clause; and

If a sale, any gross disparity, at the time of contracting, between the amount charged for the time share and the value of the time share measured by the price at which similar time shares were readily obtainable, but a disparity between the contract price and the value of the time share measured by the price at which a similar time share was readily obtainable in similar transactions does not, of itself, render the contract unconscionable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-1.06.
Obligation of good faith.

Every contract or duty governed by this chapter imposes an obligation of good faith in its performance or enforcement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-1.07.
Remedies to be liberally administered.

The remedies provided by this chapter shall be liberally administered to the end that the aggrieved party is put in as good a position as if the other party had fully performed. However, consequential, special, or punitive damages may not be awarded except as specifically provided in this chapter or by other rule of law.

Any right or obligation declared by this chapter is enforceable by judicial proceeding.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-1.08.
Supplemental general principles of law applicable.

The principles of law and equity, including the law of corporations (and unincorporated associations), the law of real property and the law relative to capacity to contract, principal and agent, eminent domain, estoppel, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, receivership, substantial performance, or other validating or invalidating cause supplement the provisions of this chapter, except to the extent inconsistent with this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-1.09.
Conflicts with other statutes.

This chapter shall be the sole law of this state governing the creation and disposition of time shares. In the event of any conflict between this chapter and chapters 36, 36.1 or 38 of this title, the provisions of this chapter prevail, but this chapter does not invalidate or otherwise affect rights or obligations vested under those statutes before May 7, 1984, or the manner of their exercise or enforcement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-1.10.
[Reserved.]

34-41-1.11.
Applicability.

This chapter applies to all time shares created in units within this state after May 7, 1984. Sections

34-41-1.03

(Status and Taxation of Time-Share Estates), 34-41-1.08 (Supplemental General Principles of Law Applicable), 34-41-1.05 (Unconscionable Agreement or Term of Contract), 34-41-1.06 (Obligation of Good Faith), 34-41-1.07 (Remedies to be Liberally Administered), 34-41-2.04 (Partition),

34-41-3.02(a)(1)

through (9) and (14) through (16) and (b) (Powers of Managing Entity), 34-41-3.07 (Tort and Contract Liability), 34-41-3.11 (Lien for Assessments), 34-41-3.13 (Authority of Trustee), 34-41-4.09 (Liens), 34-41-4.14 (Statute of Limitation for Warranties), and § 34-41-1.02 (Definitions) to the extent necessary in construing any of those sections, apply to all time shares created in units in this state before May 7, 1984, but only with respect to events and circumstances occurring after May 7, 1984. They do not affect the validity of, or rights or obligations created by, pre-existing provisions of any time-share instrument, document transferring an estate or interest in real property, or contract.

The time-share instrument of any time-share property created before May 7, 1984 may be amended to accomplish any result permitted by this chapter if the amendment is adopted in conformity with applicable law and with the procedures and requirements specified by the instrument. If the amendment grants to any person any rights, powers, or privileges permitted by this chapter, all correlative obligations, liabilities, and restrictions in this chapter also apply to that person.

This chapter does not apply to time shares in units located outside this state, but the public offering statement provisions (§§

34-41-4.03

—

34-41-4.06

and

34-41-4.08

) apply to all dispositions thereof signed in this state by any party unless exempt under §

34-41-4.01(b)

and the agency regulation provisions under Article V of this chapter apply to any offering thereof in this state and the purchaser of units located outside of this state shall have the option of requiring the escrow of deposits pursuant to §

34-41-4.08

or may rescind such sales contract pursuant to §

34-41-4.06

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-1.12.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provisions or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.